Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1320.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin ROGERS; MAIN STREET (CSAH 150) RECONSTRUCTION.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $5,000,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds account in the state transportation fund as provided in Minnesota Statutes, section 174.50, to the commissioner of transportation for a grant to the city of Rogers to construct and reconstruct Main Street (County State-Aid Highway 150) in the city of Rogers from Territorial Road (County State-Aid Highway 116) to John Deere Lane, including the replacement of associated utilities, pedestrian safety improvements, and improvements consistent with the safe routes to school program under Minnesota Statutes, section 174.40. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the state transportation fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $5,000,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end